North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 136-89.183(a)(5), all initial tolls or fees to be charged by a private entity shall be reviewed by the Turnpike Authority Board. Prior to setting toll rates, either a set rate or a minimum and maximum rate set by the private entity, the private entity shall hold a public hearing on the toll rates, including an explanation of the toll setting methodology, in accordance with guidelines for the hearing developed by the Department. After tolls go into effect, the private entity shall report to the Turnpike Authority Board 30 days prior to any increase in toll rates or change in the toll setting methodology by the private entity from the previous toll rates or toll setting methodology last reported to the Turnpike Authority Board.

Financial advisors and attorneys retained by the Department on contract to work on projects pursuant to this subsection are subject to State law governing conflicts of interest.

60 days prior to the signing of a concession agreement subject to this subdivision, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the following for the presumptive concessionaire:

Project description.

Number of years that tolls will be in place.

Name and location of firms and parent companies, if applicable, including firm responsibility and stake, and assessment of audited financial statements.

Analysis of firm selection criteria.

Name of any firm or individual under contract to provide counsel or financial analysis to the Department or Authority. The Department shall disclose payments to these contractors related to completing the agreement under this subdivision.

Demonstrated ability of the project team to deliver the project, by evidence of the project team’s prior experience in delivering a project on schedule and budget, and disclosure of any unfavorable outcomes on prior projects.

Detailed description of method of finance, including sources of funds, State contribution amounts, including schedule of availability payments and terms of debt payments.

Information on assignment of risk shared or assigned to State and private partner.

Information on the feasibility of finance as obtained in traffic and revenue studies.

The Turnpike Authority annual report under

G.S. 136-89.193

shall include reporting on all revenue collections associated with projects subject to this subdivision under the Turnpike Authority.

The Department shall develop standards for entering into comprehensive agreements with private entities under the authority of this subdivision and report those standards to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on or before October 1, 2013.

(40)

To expand public access to coastal waters in its road project planning and construction programs. The Department shall work with the Wildlife Resources Commission, other State agencies, and other government entities to address public access to coastal waters along the roadways, bridges, and other transportation infrastructure owned or maintained by the Department. The Department shall adhere to all applicable design standards and guidelines in implementation of this enhanced access.

(41)

The Department shall, prior to the beginning of construction, determine whether all sidewalks and other facilities primarily intended for the use of pedestrians and bicycles that are to be constructed within the right-of-way of a public street or highway that is a part of the State highway system or an urban highway system must be constructed of permeable pavement. “Permeable pavement” means paving material that absorbs water or allows water to infiltrate through the paving material. Permeable pavement materials include porous concrete, permeable interlocking concrete pavers, concrete grid pavers, porous asphalt, and any other material with similar characteristics. Compacted gravel shall not be considered permeable pavement.

(42)

The Department shall develop and utilize a process for selection of transportation projects that is based on professional standards in order to most efficiently use limited resources to benefit all citizens of the State. The strategic prioritization process should be a systematic, data-driven process that includes a combination of quantitative data, qualitative input, and multimodal characteristics, and should include local input. The Department shall develop a process for standardizing or approving local methodology used in Metropolitan Planning Organization and Rural Transportation Planning Organization prioritization.

(43)

For the purposes of financing an agreement under subdivision (39a) or (46) of this section, the Department of Transportation may act as a conduit issuer for private activity bonds to the extent the bonds do not constitute a debt obligation of the State. The issuance of private activity bonds under this subdivision and any related actions is governed by the State and Local Government Revenue Bond Act, Article 5 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, with

G.S. 159-88

satisfied by adherence to the requirements of subdivision (39a) or (46) of this section.

(44)

To contract for sponsorship arrangements for Department operations and may solicit contracts for these arrangements pursuant to Article 2 of this Chapter. All amounts collected and all savings realized as a result of these sponsorship arrangements shall be used by the Department toward funding of maintenance activities.

(44a)

Where the Department owns or leases the passenger rail facility, owns or leases the rail equipment, or holds leasehold or license rights for the purpose of operating passenger stations, the Department may operate or contract for the following receipt-generating activities and use the proceeds to fund passenger rail operations:

To permit use of and encroachment upon the right-of-way of a State highway or road for the purpose of construction and maintenance of a bridge owned by a private or public entity, if the bridge does not unreasonably interfere with or obstruct the public use of the right-of-way. Any agreement for an encroachment authorized by this subdivision shall be approved by the Board of Transportation, upon a finding that the encroachment is necessary and appropriate, in the sole discretion of the Board. Locations, plans, and specifications for any pedestrian or vehicular bridge authorized by the Board for construction pursuant to this subdivision shall be approved by the Department of Transportation. For any bridge subject to this subdivision, the Department shall retain the right to reject any plans, specifications, or materials used or proposed to be used, inspect and approve all materials to be used, inspect the construction, maintenance, or repair, and require the replacement, reconstruction, repair, or demolition of any partially or wholly completed bridge that, in the sole discretion of the Department, is unsafe or substandard in design or construction. An encroachment agreement authorized by this subdivision may include a requirement to purchase and maintain liability insurance in an amount determined by the Department of Transportation. The Department shall ensure that any bridge constructed pursuant to this subdivision is regularly inspected for safety. The owner shall have the bridge inspected every two years by a qualified private engineering firm based on National Bridge Inspection Standards and shall provide the Department copies of the bridge inspection reports where they shall be kept on file. Any bridge authorized and constructed pursuant to this subdivision is subject to all other rules and conditions of the Department of Transportation for encroachments.

To enter into agreements with municipalities, counties, governmental entities, or nonprofit corporations to receive funds for the purposes of advancing right-of-way acquisition or the construction schedule of a project identified in the Transportation Improvement Program. If these funds are subject to repayment by the Department, prior to receipt of funds, reimbursement of all funds received by the Department shall be shown in the existing Transportation Improvement Program and shall be reimbursed within the period of the existing Transportation Improvement Program.

To enter into partnership agreements with private entities, and authorized political subdivisions to finance, by tolls, contracts, and other financing methods authorized by law, the cost of acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating transportation infrastructure in this State, and to plan, design, develop, acquire, construct, equip, maintain, and operate transportation infrastructure in this State. An agreement entered into under this subdivision requires the concurrence of the Board of Transportation. The Department shall report to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, and the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation, at the same time it notifies the Board of Transportation of any proposed agreement under this subdivision. No contract for transportation infrastructure subject to an agreement under this subdivision that commits the Department to make nonretainage payments for undisputed capital costs of a completed transportation infrastructure to be made later than 18 months after final acceptance by the Department of the transportation infrastructure shall be executed without approval of the Local Government Commission. Any contracts for construction of highways, roads, streets, and bridges which are awarded pursuant to an agreement entered into under this section shall comply with the competitive bidding requirements of Article 2 of this Chapter.

(39a) a.

The Department of Transportation or Turnpike Authority, as applicable, may enter into up to three agreements with a private entity as provided under subdivision (39) of this section for which the provisions of this section apply.

b.

A private entity or its contractors must provide performance and payment security in the form and in the amount determined by the Department of Transportation. The form of the performance and payment security may consist of bonds, letters of credit, parent guaranties, or other instruments acceptable to the Department of Transportation.

c.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 143B-426.40

A, an agreement entered into under this subdivision may allow the private entity to assign, transfer, sell, hypothecate, and otherwise convey some or all of its right, title, and interest in and to the agreement, and any rights and remedies thereunder, to a lender, bondholder, or any other party. However, in no event shall any such assignment create additional debt or debt-like obligations of the State of North Carolina, the Department, or any other agency, authority, commission, or similar subdivision of the State to any lender, bondholder, entity purchasing a participation in the right to receive the payment, trustee, trust, or any other party providing financing or funding of projects described in this section. This sub-subdivision does not preclude the Department from making any payments due and owing pursuant to an agreement entered into under this section.

d.

Article 6H of this Chapter applies to the Department of Transportation and to projects undertaken by the Department of Transportation under subdivision (39) of this section. The Department may assign its authority under that Article to fix, revise, charge, retain, enforce, and collect tolls and fees to the private entity.

e.

Any contract under this subdivision or under Article 6H of this Chapter for the development, construction, maintenance, or operation of a project shall provide for revenue sharing, if applicable, between the private party and the Department, and revenues derived from the project may be used as set forth in G.S. 136-89.188(a), notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 136-89.188(d). Excess toll revenues from a Turnpike Project shall be used for the funding or financing of transportation projects within the corridor where the Turnpike Project is located. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “excess toll revenues” means those toll revenues derived from a Turnpike Project that are not otherwise used or allocated to the Authority or a private entity pursuant to this subdivision, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 136-89.188(d). For purposes of this subdivision, the term “corridor” means (i) the right-of-way limits of the Turnpike Project and any facilities related to the Turnpike Project or any facility or improvement necessary for the use, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, or financing of a Turnpike Project; (ii) the right-of-way limits of any subsequent improvements, additions, or extension to the Turnpike Project and facilities related to the Turnpike projects, including any improvements necessary for the use, design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, reconstruction, or financing of those subsequent improvements, additions, or extensions to the Turnpike Project; and (iii) roads used for ingress or egress to the toll facility or roads that intersect with the toll facility, whether by ramps or separated grade facility, and located within one mile in any direction.

f.

Agreements entered into under this subdivision shall comply with the following additional provisions:

Where the Department owns the passenger rail facility or owns or leases the rail equipment, operation of concessions on State-funded passenger trains and at passenger rail facilities to provide to passengers food, drink, and other refreshments, personal comfort items, Internet access, and souvenirs publicizing the passenger rail system.

Where the Department holds leasehold or license rights for the purpose of operating passenger stations, operation of concessions at rail passenger facilities to provide food, drink, and other refreshments, personal comfort items, Internet access, and souvenirs publicizing the passenger rail system, in accordance with the terms of the leasehold or license.

Advertising on or within the Department’s passenger rail equipment or facility, including display advertising and advertising delivered to passengers through the use of video monitors, public address systems installed in passenger areas, and other electronic media.

The sale of naming rights to Department-owned passenger rail equipment or facilities.

(45)

The Department shall not transfer ownership of a State-owned concrete arch bridge to any public, private, or nonprofit entity as part of any bridge relocation or reuse program project unless the entity assumes all liability associated with the bridge and posts a bond or other financial assurance acceptable to the Department to cover the present value of future maintenance costs, as well as any right-of-way or other additional costs if the bridge transfer would require the Department to change the planned route of any replacement structure.

(46)

To enter into partnership agreements with private entities to finance, by contracts, revenues of facilities, and other financing methods authorized by law, the cost of acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, and operating communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure on the Interstate System as defined by Title 23, United States Code, Section 103(c) in this State, and to plan, design, develop, acquire, construct, equip, maintain, and operate communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure within this State. For the purposes of this subdivision, communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure means fiber optic trunk lines, microcell towers or other broadband or data transmission facilities located within the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway system that is owned, and utilized completely or partly, by the Department for traffic management, highway safety, vehicle technology integration, and other functions of the Department. An agreement entered into under this subdivision requires the concurrence of the Board of Transportation. The Department shall report to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Transportation, and the Chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation, at the same time it notifies the Board of Transportation of any proposed agreement under this subdivision. No contract for communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure subject to such an agreement that commits the Department to make nonretainage payments for undisputed capital costs for communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure to be made later than 18 months after final acceptance by the Department shall be executed without approval of the Local Government Commission. Any contracts for communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure which are awarded pursuant to an agreement entered into under this subdivision shall comply with the competitive bidding requirements of this Article. The Department may enter into agreements with one or more private entities under this subdivision as follows:

a.

A private entity or its contractors must provide performance and payment security in the form of performance and payment bonds on the design and construction portion of the agreement as required under

G.S. 44A-26

.

b.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 143B-426.40

A, an agreement entered into under this subdivision may allow the private entity to assign, transfer, sell, hypothecate, and otherwise convey some or all of its right, title, and interest in and to such agreement, and any rights and remedies thereunder, to a lender, bondholder, or any other party. However, in no event shall any such assignment create additional debt or debt-like obligations of the State of North Carolina, the Department, or any other agency, authority, commission, or similar subdivision of the State to any lender, bondholder, entity purchasing a participation in the right to receive the payment, trustee, trust, or any other party providing financing or funding of projects described in this subdivision. The foregoing shall not preclude the Department from making any payments due and owing pursuant to an agreement entered into under this subdivision.

c.

An agreement entered into under this subdivision for communications infrastructure supporting transportation infrastructure may provide that private entities may commercialize the capacity of such communications infrastructure in excess of the Department’s need through lease or other arrangements, with the Department having first right of refusal for future anticipated capacity needs.

d.

No agreement entered into under this subdivision for use of Department right-of-way or communications infrastructure and its facilities shall abrogate the Department’s ownership and control of the right-of-way or communications infrastructure and its facilities within the right-of-way.

Agreements entered into under this subdivision shall comply with the following additional provisions:

The Department shall solicit proposals for an agreement.

An agreement shall be limited to no more than 50 years from the date the communications infrastructure becomes operational and utilized by the Department.

Financial advisors and attorneys retained by the Department on contract to work on projects pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to State law governing conflicts of interest.

Sixty days prior to the signing of a concession agreement subject to this subdivision, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the following for the presumptive concessionaire:

Project description.

Name and location of firms and parent companies, if applicable, including firm responsibility and stake, and assessment of audited financial statements.

Analysis of firm selection criteria.

Name of any firm or individual under contract to provide counsel or financial analysis to the Department. The Department shall disclose payments to these contractors related to completing the agreement under this subdivision.

Demonstrated ability of the project team to deliver the project, by evidence of the project team’s prior experience in delivering a project on schedule and budget, and disclosure of any unfavorable outcomes on prior projects.

Detailed description of method of finance, including sources of funds, State contribution amounts, including schedule of availability payments, service payments or similar remuneration, and terms of debt payments.

Information on assignment of risk shared or assigned to the Department, the State, and private entity partner.

Information on the feasibility of finance.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 10; 1923, c. 160, s. 1; c. 247; C.S., s. 3846(j); 1929, c. 138, s. 1; 1931, c. 145, ss. 21, 25; 1933, c. 172; c. 517, c. 1; 1935, c. 213, s. 1; c. 301; 1937, c. 297, s. 2; c. 407, s. 80; 1941, c. 47; c. 217, s. 6; 1943, c. 410; 1945, c. 842; 1951, c. 372; 1953, c. 437; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; c. 349, s. 9; 1959, c. 557; 1963, cc. 520, 1155; 1965, c. 879, s. 1; 1967, c. 1129; 1969, c. 794, s. 2; 1971, cc. 289, 291, 292, 977; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 460, ss. 1, 2; c. 464, ss. 7.1, 14, 42; 1981, c. 682, s. 19; 1983, c. 84; c. 102; 1985, c. 718, ss. 1, 6; 1987, c. 311; c. 417, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 158; 1989 (Reg. Sess. 1990), c. 962, s. 1; 1993, c. 197, s. 2; c. 488, s. 1; c. 524, s. 4; c. 539, ss. 974-977; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 247, s. 1; c. 507, s. 18.2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 673, s. 4; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 19.10(a); 1997-428, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-123, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 102; 2001-424, s. 27.27; 2003-184, s. 1; 2003-267, s. 1; 2004-168, s. 1; 2005-403, s. 2; 2006-230, s. 1(a); 2007-428, s. 1; 2007-439, s. 1; 2007-485, s. 3.1; 2008-164, s. 1; 2008-180, ss. 2, 8; 2009-266, s. 6; 2009-451, s. 25.6(a); 2010-97, s. 14; 2010-165, ss. 4, 4(a), 5-8; 2012-84, s. 2; 2012-184, s. 1; 2013-137, ss. 1, 2; 2013-183, ss. 4.2, 5.2; 2013-266, s. 1; 2014-58, ss. 9, 13; 2014-100, s. 34.27; 2014-115, s. 56.2; 2015-241, s. 29.22(a); 2016-90, s. 2(a); 2017-57, s. 34.6A(a); 2017-159, s. 3(a); 2017-197, s. 7.5; 2019-76, s. 23; 2019-111, s. 2.5(o); 2019-148, s. 1; 2019-199, s. 5(a), (b); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d); 2020-91, s. 4.5(a).

Cross References.

As to motor vehicles generally, see Chapter 20 of the General Statutes,

G.S. 20-1

et seq.

As to authority to designate and mark truck routes, see

G.S. 20-141(i)

.

As to the Public Utilities Act, see

G.S. 62-1

et seq.

As to Department’s power of eminent domain, see

G.S. 136-19

.

As to power to determine the maximum load limit for bridges, see

G.S. 136-72

.

As to exemption from temporary driveway permitting for forestry operations, see

G.S. 136-92.1

.

As to selective pruning within highway rights-of-way to enable view of agritourism activities, see

G.S. 136-93.3

.

As to authority of Department to cooperate with counties in establishing and operating solid waste disposal facilities, see

G.S. 153A-291

.

As to sale, lease, exchange and joint use of governmental property by State and local governmental units, see

G.S. 160A-274

.

Rail Division/Report Required Prior to Entering into Certain Contracts.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 34.24(a), (b), provides: “(a) In addition to any other requirements provided by State or federal law, the Rail Division of the Department of Transportation shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee prior to entering into a contract with a duration of five or more years and requiring an estimated expenditure of State funds in an amount totaling or exceeding one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000). The report shall (i) identify the total cost of the proposed contract, (ii) identify the duration of the proposed contract, (iii) identify the other party or parties to the proposed contract, and (iv) identify any other terms of the proposed contract that are deemed relevant by the Rail Division.

“(b) This section is effective when it becomes law [June 28, 2017] and applies to contracts entered into on or after that date. This section expires June 30, 2022.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 34.34(a)-(c), as amended by Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.21(a), provides: “(a) Pilot Project. — The Department of Transportation shall develop and implement a pilot project to provide funding for operating a rest area on U.S. Highway 220 in Richmond County. From funds appropriated in this act to the Roadside Environmental Fund in the Highway Fund, the Department shall allocate the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium to the Town of Ellerbe for funding the rest area described in this subsection. The funds allocated under this subsection shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available until expended in accordance with the purpose set forth in this subsection.

“(b) Distribution of Brochures. — Notwithstanding any State law or rule to the contrary, brochures and other materials advertising local attractions and accommodations may be distributed at the rest area funded under subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) Report. — The Department shall provide a report on the results of the pilot project required under subsection (a) of this section to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee by December 1, 2019. The report shall include (i) the average daily number of visitors to the rest area, (ii) the average monthly number of visitors to the rest area, (iii) the total number of visitors to the rest area, and (iv) the average annual costs to operate the rest area. The information required under this subsection shall be for the period from when the rest area begins operation to November 1, 2019.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.3(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws
2019-15, s. 4(b), provide: “(a) Limited Authority for Time-Critical Economic Development Project. — Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Transportation may let, administer, and oversee any contract related to the site preparation and design of the non-transportation portion of a project meeting all of the following criteria:

“(1) The project is located in Edgecombe County.

“(2) The project received a grant under the Job Development Investment Grant Program established under

G.S. 143B-437.52

.

“(3) The Community Economic Development Agreement entered into pursuant to

G.S. 143B-437.57

for the project requires that the business invest at least five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in private funds and create at least 800 eligible positions.

“The Department shall only let contracts under this subsection in accordance with the requirements of Article 2 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes. The authority set forth in this subsection expires July 1, 2020.

“(b) Source of Funding for Costs. — Of the funds appropriated in this act to the General Maintenance Reserve in the Highway Fund, the Department of Transportation may use up to the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to cover costs incurred by the Department in utilizing the authority set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) Report. — By January 15, 2019, the Department of Transportation shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Governmental Operations, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly detailing the use of funds under subsection (b) of this section. The report shall include the total amount of funds expended and the types of costs for which the funds were or are going to be expended.

“(d) Repealed by Session Laws
2019-15, s. 4(b), effective May 16, 2019.

“(e) Effective Date. — Subsection (a) of this section is effective when it becomes law [June 12, 2018] and applies retroactively to July 1, 2017. Subsection (b) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2018. The remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.13(a)-(e), provides: “(a) Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term ‘construction manager-general contractor’ means a project delivery method that allows the use of a construction manager during the design process to provide input on the design. During the design phase, the construction manager provides advice, including constructability review, scheduling, pricing, and phasing, to assist in designing a more efficient and well-designed project. The construction manager may subsequently act as the general contractor and construct the project if the department and the construction manager-general contractor reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price for construction.

“(b) Pilot Project. — Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes to the contrary, the Department of Transportation may establish and implement a pilot project to award contracts for up to five projects for the construction of transportation projects on a construction manager-general contractor basis. The Department may only award a contract under this section if (i) the cost of the project is determined by the Department to be less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), (ii) the Department determines that it is in the public interest to use the construction manager-general contractor basis for the project, (iii) the Department prequalifies the contractor that will be awarded the contract, (iv) the Department complies with the pre-award reporting requirement set forth in subsection (c) of this section, and (v) the Department has established and implemented guidelines as required under subsection (d) of this section.

“(c) Report. — Prior to the award of a contract under the authority set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall submit a pre-award report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the nature and scope of the project and the reasons using the construction manager-general contractor basis will best serve the public interest. Upon completion of a project awarded under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall submit a post-completion report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee detailing the results of the project, including any cost and time efficiencies achieved as a result of using the construction manager-general contractor basis.

“(d) Guidelines. — The Department shall develop and implement guidelines for the awarding of contracts under subsection (b) of this section.

“(e) Effective Date. — This section is effective when it becomes law [June 12, 2018]. This section expires upon submission of the post-completion report required under subsection (c) of this section for the final project completed under the authority set forth in subsection (b) of this section.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.16, as amended by Session Laws
2018-97, s. 7.3, provides: “Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Transportation shall designate the bridges described in the subdivisions below as follows:

“(1) The Millstone Road bridge over Interstate 73 and Interstate 74 and located off Exit 28 in the Town of Ellerbe in Richmond County as the ‘Colonel Jack F. Cardwell Bridge’.

“(2) The bridge numbered 252 by the Department that is located in the City of Lowell in Gaston County as the ‘Sgt. Larry K. Morrow, Vietnam-MIA, 5-29-1972 Bridge’.

“(3) The bridge on U.S. Highway 158 East that crosses part of the Interstate 74 Northern Beltway in Forsyth County as the ‘Officer Stephen Levi Amos II Bridge’.

“(4) The bridge on N.C. Highway 18 that crosses the U.S. Highway 74 Bypass in the City of Shelby in Cleveland County as the ‘Officer Tim Brackeen Bridge’.

“(5) The bridge on Pharr Mill Road that crosses North Carolina Highway 49 in the Town of Harrisburg in Cabarrus County as the ‘Joshua B. Earley Bridge’.

“(6) The U.S. 221/U.S. 421 Overpass in the Community of Deep Gap in Watauga County as the ‘Sgt. Dillon C. Baldridge Bridge’.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.17, provides: “ The Department of Transportation shall report to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Department of Transportation, and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly at least 15 days prior to submission of a grant application for funding through the United States Department of Transportation Better Utilizing Investments to Leverage Development (BUILD) Transportation Discretionary Grants program. The report shall contain project information, including a description and time line for completion, project cost and the amount of grant requested, and a brief overview of which federal criteria the project proposes to meet, including safety, economic competitiveness, quality of life, environmental protection, state of good repair, innovation, partnership, and additional nonfederal revenue for future transportation infrastructure investments.”

Session Laws
2021-3, s. 2.7(a), (b), provides: “(a) Notwithstanding
G.S. 136-18(5),
136-18(29),
136-93,
160D-1116, and any other provision of law to the contrary, a local government shall issue a temporary certificate of compliance and temporary certificate of occupancy to a health service facility (facility) allowing for the full operational use of the facility in the following circumstances:

“(1) The facility building is currently under construction, and the scheduled construction completion date for the building will occur before recission of the COVID-19 emergency declaration.

“(2) Subject to subdivision (3) of this section, the facility building complies with all applicable State and local laws and the terms of the building permit, and the facility building may be safely occupied.

“(3) The only portions of the construction project remaining to be completed are off-site improvements to public roadways that were identified by the Traffic Impact Analysis for the project and required as conditions for the approval of the permit, and the facility agrees to (i) complete the roadway improvements within 18 months of the date of the certificate of occupancy and (ii) post a corresponding performance bond or letter of credit. The performance bond completion date and letter of credit expiration date, and all other terms of both instruments, shall remain in force notwithstanding the recission of the COVID-19 emergency declaration prior to the completion of the roadway improvements.

“For purposes of this section, the term ‘local government’ has the same meaning as in

G.S. 160D-1116

, the term ‘health service facility’ has the same meaning as in

G.S. 131E-176

, and the term ‘COVID-19 emergency declaration’ means Executive Order No. 116 issued March 10, 2020.

“(b) This section is effective when it becomes law [March 11, 2021] and expires upon recission of the COVID-19 emergency declaration or upon completion of the roadway improvements as agreed to by the facility, whichever is later.”

Session Laws
2021-134, s. 11(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Notwithstanding Part 3 and Part 4 of Article 15 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Transportation may manage, procure information technology goods and services, and enter into contracts for up to five information technology projects for Division of Motor Vehicles system modernization, and these projects are exempt from Department of Information Technology oversight and requirements. These projects may include modernization of the Division of Motor Vehicles’ electronic services and the Division’s mail intake, handling, and management systems and practices.

“(b) The Department of Transportation shall notify the Department of Information Technology of the nature and scope of an information technology project the Department of Transportation is undertaking pursuant to the exemption under subsection (a) of this section.

“(c) The Department of Transportation shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, and the Fiscal Research Division within 30 days of entering into a contract for an information technology project the Department of Transportation is undertaking pursuant to the exemption under subsection (a) of this section.”